District of Columbia statutes.
29-704.02

General partner agent of limited partnership.

(a)

Each general partner shall be an agent of the limited partnership for the purposes of its activities and affairs.

(b)

An act of a general partner, including the signing of a record in the partnership’s name, for apparently carrying on in the ordinary course the limited partnership’s activities or affairs or activities or affairs of the kind carried on by the limited partnership shall bind the limited partnership, unless the general partner did not have authority to act for the limited partnership in the particular matter and the person with which the general partner was dealing knew, had received a notification, or had notice under § 29-701.03(d) that the general partner lacked authority.

(c)

An act of a general partner which is not apparently for carrying on in the ordinary course the limited partnership’s activities or affairs or activities or affairs of the kind carried on by the limited partnership shall bind the limited partnership only if the act was actually authorized by all the other partners.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-706.06, § 29-708.04, and § 29-710.08.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities” in (a); and substituted “activities or affairs or activities or affairs” for “activities or activities” in (b) and (c).

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 402 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.